North Carolina statutes. Chapter 104B. Hurricanes or Other Acts of Nature.
Article 1. In General.

§ 104B-1.
Removal of property deposited by hurricane or other act of nature.

Whenever the house, garage, building, or any part thereof, or other property of a person, firm or corporation shall be deposited on the land of another by any hurricane, tornado, tidal wave, flood or other act of nature and is not removed from said land within 30 days after the deposit, the owner of such land may notify in writing the owner of the house, garage, building, or other property of such deposit and may require owner to remove the property so deposited within 60 days after receipt of the notice. If the owner of the deposited property fails to remove it within 60 days after receipt of the notice, the owner of the land may remove the deposited property and destroy it or may use it as he sees fit without incurring liability to the owner of the deposited property, or may sell it and retain the proceeds for his own use; provided, the amount by which the proceeds of any such sale exceed the cost of removal and sale shall be paid to the owner of the deposited property or held for his account.

If the owner of the land is unable to notify the owner of the deposited property and, after diligent search, the owner of the deposited property cannot be located and notified, the owner of the land may, at any time after the expiration of 120 days from the date of the deposit of the property on his land, remove, use, or sell the deposited property in the same manner and under the same restrictions as provided above for removal, use, or sale after notice.

Sales made under this section may be either public or private sales.

History.

1955, c. 643.